apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<pardef n="abat/tre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>taient</l>    <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tais</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tais</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tait</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tant</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e>       <p><l>tant</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tent</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tent</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tez</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tez</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tez</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tiez</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tiez</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tions</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tions</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tirent</l>    <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tis</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tis</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tisse</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tissent</l>   <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tisses</l>    <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tissiez</l>   <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tissions</l>  <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tit</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tons</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tons</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tons</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tra</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>trai</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>traient</l>   <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>trais</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>trais</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>trait</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tras</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tre</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>trez</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>triez</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>trions</l>    <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>trons</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tront</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tu</l>        <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tue</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tues</l>      <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tus</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tîmes</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tît</l>       <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tîtes</l>     <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abeille__n" c="autoconcord:f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="maire__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>sses</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cadet__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="beur__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="speaker__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>ines</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ine</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="incognito__n" c="autoconcord:m,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="abattre">         <i>abat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anode" a="revo">  <i>anode</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="baignade" a="eleka"><i>baignade</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="battre">          <i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="battre à mort">   <i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>mort</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>mort</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="battre des sabots"><i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>sabots</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>sabots</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="battre du tambour"><i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>du<b/>tambour</l><r><g><b/>du<b/>tambour</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="battre en duel">  <i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>duel</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>duel</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="beur">            <i>beur</i><par n="beur__n"/></e>
<e lm="brome" a="revo">  <i>brome</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="cadet">           <i>cadet</i><par n="cadet__n"/></e>
<e lm="chasse à courre"> <i>chasse</i><par n="abeille__n"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>courre</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>courre</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="combattre">       <i>combat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comte">           <i>comte</i><par n="maire__n"/></e>
<e lm="conduite de pétrole"><i>conduite</i><par n="abeille__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>pétrole</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>pétrole</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="culmination" a="revo"><i>culmination</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="débattre">        <i>débat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disparition">     <i>disparition</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="ébattre">         <i>ébat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="envolée">         <i>envolée</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="média">    <p><l>mass<b/>media</l><r>média</r></p><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="média">    <p><l>mass<b/>média</l><r>média</r></p><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="média">    <p><l>mass-media</l><r>média</r></p><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="média">    <p><l>mass-média</l><r>média</r></p><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e lm="facette" a="webform"><i>facette</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="favori">          <i>favori</i><par n="cadet__n"/></e>
<e lm="galerie d'aération"><i>galerie</i><par n="abeille__n"/><p><l><b/>d'aération</l><r><g><b/>d'aération</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="homonymie" a="bech"><i>homonymie</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="incognito">       <i>incognito</i><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e lm="instabilité">     <i>instabilité</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="legato">          <i>legato</i><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e lm="lingette" a="revo"><i>lingette</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="maire">           <i>maire</i><par n="maire__n"/></e>
<e lm="média">           <i>média</i><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e lm="média de masse">  <i>média</i><par n="incognito__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>masse</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>masse</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="menuiserie">      <i>menuiserie</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="normalité" a="webform"><i>normalité</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="pelote" a="revo"> <i>pelote</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="population">      <i>population</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="rancune" a="revo"><i>rancune</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="route">           <i>route</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="scherzo">         <i>scherzo</i><par n="incognito__n"/></e>
<e lm="speaker">         <i>speaker</i><par n="speaker__n"/></e>
<e lm="sphère">          <i>sphère</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="tôle" a="webform"><i>tôle</i><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e lm="vicomte">         <i>vicomte</i><par n="maire__n"/></e>
<e lm="vielle à roue">   <i>vielle</i><par n="abeille__n"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>roue</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>roue</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ébattre">  <p><l>Ebat</l>      <r>Ébat</r></p><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="évasion">  <p><l>Evasion</l>   <r>Évasion</r></p><par n="abeille__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="battre à mort"><i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>à<b/>mort</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>mort</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="battre des sabots"><i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>des<b/>sabots</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>sabots</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="battre du tambour"><i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>du<b/>tambour</l><r><g><b/>du<b/>tambour</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="battre en duel"><i>bat</i><par n="abat/tre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>en<b/>duel</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>duel</g></r></p></e>
